Utah statutes.
35A-8-419.   Issuance of bonds -- Other laws not to apply.

(1)  This part constitutes full authority for the authorization and issuance of bonds.

(2)  No other law for the authorization or issuance of obligations or the deposit of their proceeds that requires a bond election or in any way impedes or restricts the carrying out of the acts authorized to be done shall be construed as applying to any proceedings taken or acts done under this part.

